Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1671.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:


It is the intent of the Legislature to:


1. Protect children in this state from the accidental discharge


of firearms by providing age-appropriate firearm education and


instruction; and



Req. No. 3168 Page 1


2. Empower the Department of Wildlife Conservation to work with


the State Department of Education to create and approve age-


appropriate firearm safety courses.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 11-103.6q of Title 70, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The State Department of Education, in consultation with the


Department of Wildlife Conservation, shall determine the earliest


grade in which it is appropriate for students to begin receiving


instruction on firearm safety. To make the determination, the State


Department of Education and the Department of Wildlife Conservation


shall study relevant data and risk factors including, but not


limited to, the earliest age at which:


1. Incidents of injury involving firearms are reported; and


2. Children are susceptible to harm from unsecured firearms to


which they are able to gain access.


B. Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, each public school


district and public charter school shall annually provide students


with age-appropriate and grade-appropriate instruction on firearm


safety. The curriculum or program of instruction shall:


1. Be approved by the State Department of Education;


2. Begin in the earliest appropriate grade as determined by the


State Department of Education and the Department of Wildlife


Conservation and continue through the twelfth grade;

Req. No. 3168 Page 2


3. Include instruction on the following:


a. the steps to take if a student finds an unsecured


firearm including, but not limited to, the importance


of:


(1) avoiding injury if the student finds an unsecured


firearm,


(2) never touching a firearm if the student finds an


unsecured firearm, and


(3) immediately notifying an adult of the location of


the unsecured firearm,


b. school safety relating to firearms, and


c. the proper handling and safe storage of firearms; and


4. Include neutral viewpoints on all included topics including,


but not limited to, the prevention of accidental firearm injury.


C. The State Department of Education may approve a curriculum


or program of instruction for the education of students on firearm


safety if such curriculum or program of instruction and related


instructional materials bear a brand or stated organizational


affiliation including, but not limited to, a brand issued by this


state or any of its agencies.


D. The State Department of Education shall use the following


preferred methods of instruction in determining the curriculum or


program of instruction to be used to educate students on firearm


safety:

Req. No. 3168 Page 3


1. The viewing of a video produced by the Department of


Wildlife Conservation or a Department-approved source;


2. The review of online resources and materials; and


3. An alternative curriculum, which may include an off-campus


firearm safety course approved by the Department of Wildlife


Conservation and may be provided in conjunction with a live-fire


exercise or sporting event. If such a curriculum is provided in


conjunction with a live-fire exercise or sporting event, the public


school district shall obtain prior written consent from the


participating student’s parent or legal guardian.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.


SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-3168 EB 1/14/2026 9:39:16 AM















Req. No. 3168 Page 4